North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-03 Legislative Assembly
54-03-01.14.
Legislative districts.

Each legislative district is entitled to one senator and two representatives. Districts 4 and 9 are divided into subdistricts, and one representative must be elected from each subdistrict. A representative elected from a subdistrict must be, on the day of election, a qualified elector in the subdistrict from which the representative was chosen. The legislative districts of the state are formed as follows:

District 1 consists of that part of the city of Williston and Stony Creek and Williston Townships in Williams County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of thirty-second avenue west intersects with the centerline of twenty-sixth street west, then east on twenty-sixth street west and an extended straight line until it becomes twenty-sixth street east, then east on twenty-sixth street east until it becomes thirteenth avenue east, then north on thirteenth avenue east and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fourth street northwest, then east on fifty-fourth street northwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred thirty-fourth avenue northwest, also identified as United States highway 85 bypass, then south on one hundred thirty-fourth avenue northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the Williston city limit, then south, east, north, and south on the Williston city limit until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 1804, then west on state highway 1804 until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-seventh avenue southeast, then south on thirty-seventh avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of forty-ninth lane northwest, then west on forty-ninth lane northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the south boundary of Williams County, then west on the south boundary of Williams County until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of thirty-second avenue west, also identified as one hundred thirty-eighth avenue northwest, then north on a straight line extended from thirty-second avenue west and on thirty-second avenue west to the point of beginning.

District 2 consists of all of Burke County and Divide County; all of Williams County except those portions contained in Districts 1 and 23; and Bicker, Cottonwood, Idaho, James Hill, Lostwood, Manitou, Myrtle, Powers, Powers Lake, Ross, Sorkness, and White Earth Townships in Mountrail County.

District 3 consists of New Prairie, Sundre, and Surrey Townships in Ward County; and that part of the city of Minot and Nedrose Township in Ward County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of twenty-seventh street northeast intersects with the north boundary of Nedrose Township, also identified as forty-sixth avenue northeast, then east on the north boundary of Nedrose Township until its intersection with the east boundary of Nedrose Township, then south on the east boundary of Nedrose Township until its intersection with the south boundary of Nedrose Township, then west on the south boundary of Nedrose Township until its intersection with the Minot city limit, then south and west on the Minot city limit until its intersection with the west boundary of Sundre Township, then north on the west boundary of Sundre Township until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth street southeast, then north on thirteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of soo street southeast, then north and west on soo street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of seventh street southeast, then north on seventh street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of valley street, then north and west on valley street until its intersection with the centerline of burdick expressway, then west on burdick expressway until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as south broadway, then north on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth avenue, then east on nineteenth avenue until its intersection with airport road, then east on airport road until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth avenue northeast, then east on nineteenth avenue northeast and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street northeast, then north on twenty-seventh street northeast to the point of beginning.

District 4 consists of those portions of Dunn County, McKenzie County, McLean County, Mercer County, Mountrail County, and Ward County within the Fort Berthold reservation; all of Mountrail County except those portions contained in District 2; all of Ward County except those portions contained in Districts 3, 5, 6, 38, and 40; and that part of McLean County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the Fort Berthold reservation boundary and the north boundary of McLean County, then east on the north boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, then south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the south boundary of Snow Township, then west on the south boundary of Snow Township until its intersection with the southeast corner of North Central McLean Unorganized Township, then west and south on the south boundary of North Central McLean Unorganized Township until its intersection with the south boundary of McLean County, then west on the south boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the Fort Berthold reservation boundary, then north, west, and north on the Fort Berthold reservation boundary to the point of beginning.

District 4A consists of those portions of Dunn County, McKenzie County, McLean County, Mercer County, Mountrail County, and Ward County within the Fort Berthold reservation.

District 4B consists of all of Mountrail County except those portions contained in Districts 2 and 4A; all of Ward County except those portions contained in Districts 3, 4 A, 5, 6, 38, and 40; and that part of McLean County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the Fort Berthold reservation boundary and the north boundary of McLean County, then east on the north boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, then south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the south boundary of Snow Township, then west on the south boundary of Snow Township until its intersection with the southeast corner of North Central McLean Unorganized Township, then west and south on the south boundary of North Central McLean Unorganized Township until its intersection with the south boundary of McLean County, then west on the south boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the Fort Berthold reservation boundary, then north, west, and north on the Fort Berthold reservation boundary to the point of beginning.

District 5 consists of that part of the city of Minot and Harrison Township in Ward County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of sixteenth street northwest intersects with the centerline of fourth avenue northwest, then east on fourth avenue northwest until it becomes third avenue northwest, then east on third avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as north broadway, then south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with burdick expressway, then east on burdick expressway until its intersection with the centerline of valley street, then south and east on valley street until its intersection with the centerline of seventh street southeast, then south on seventh street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of soo street, then south and east on soo street until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth street southeast, then south on thirteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of eleventh avenue southeast, then east on eleventh avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth street southeast, then south on thirteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of Untied States highway 2, also identified as United States highway 52, until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as south broadway, then south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-seventh avenue southwest, then west on thirty-seventh avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth street southwest, then north on thirtieth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of twentieth avenue southwest, then north and west on twentieth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third street southwest, then north on thirty-third street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 2, then east on United States highway 2 until its intersection with the centerline of the United States highway 83 bypass, then north on the United States highway 83 bypass until its intersection with the centerline of the Canadian Pacific railway company right of way, then east on the Canadian Pacific railway right of way until its intersection with the centerline of sixteenth street northwest, then north on sixteenth street northwest to the point of beginning.

District 6 consists of all of Bottineau County, McHenry County, and Renville County; all of McLean County except those portions contained in Districts 4 and 33; and that part of Ward County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of United States highway 83 intersects with the north boundary of Freedom Township, also identified as one hundred twenty-first avenue southeast, then east on the north boundaries of Freedom, Sawyer, and Willis Townships to the east boundary of Ward County, then south on the east boundary of Ward County to the south boundary of Ward County, then west on the south boundary of Ward County until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, then north on United States highway 83 to the point of beginning.

District 7 consists of that part of the city of Bismarck and Hay Creek Township in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of Hay Creek Township intersects with the centerline of the Missouri River, then east and south on the boundary of Hay Creek Township until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as state street, then north on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of forty-third avenue northeast, then west on forty-third avenue northeast until its intersection with the centerline of north washington street, then north on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-seventh avenue northwest, then west on fifty-seventh avenue northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of river road, then north and west on river road until its intersection with the centerline of the north segment of burnt creek loop, then west and south on burnt creek loop until its intersection with the centerline of a straight line extended east from magnolia drive, then southwest on an extended straight line until its intersection with olive tree drive, then west on olive tree drive and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

District 8 consists of all of Emmons County; the city of Wilton in Burliegh and McLean Counties; Boyd, Burnt Creek-Riverview, Gibbs, Glenview, Logan, Long Lake, Menoken, Morton, Naughton, Taft, Telfer, Thelma, Painted Woods, and Wild Rose Townships in Burleigh County; that part of Ecklund Township bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of Ecklund Township intersects with the west boundary of Ecklund Township, then east, south, east, north, and east on the north boundary of Ecklund Township until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-sixth street northeast, then south on twenty-sixth street northeast until its intersection with the south boundary of Ecklund Township, then east and north on the south boundary of Ecklund Township to the point of beginning; that part of the city of Bismarck in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of interstate highway 94 intersects with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as centennial road, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the west boundary of Gibbs Township and the Bismarck city limit, then south on the west boundary of Gibbs Township until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth avenue northeast, then west on seventeenth avenue northeast until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-sixth street northeast, then north on fifty-sixth street northeast until its intersection with the extended centerline of miriam avenue, then west on the extended centerline of miriam avenue and on miriam avenue until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as centennial road, then north on business interstate highway 94 to the point of beginning; and that part of Apple Creek and Missouri Townships in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the west boundary of Apple Creek Township intersects with the east boundary of the Bismarck city limit, then east and south on the west boundary of Apple Creek Township until its intersection with the east boundary of Missouri Township, then south and west on the east boundary of Missouri Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north on the centerline of the Missouri River until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of ninety-third street southeast, then north on a straight line extended from ninety-third street southeast and on ninety-third street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-sixth avenue southeast, then west on seventy-sixth avenue southeast, also identified as the south boundary of Apple Creek Township, until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-sixth street southeast, then north on sixty-sixth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of forty-eighth avenue southeast, then west on forty-eighth avenue southeast until its intersection with the west boundary of Apple Creek Township, then north on the west boundary of Apple Creek Township to the point of beginning.

District 9 consists of all of Rolette County; all of Towner County except that portion contained in District 15; and all of Cavalier County except that portion contained in District 19.

District 9A consists of all of Rolette County except that portion contained in District 9B.

District 9B consists of all of Towner County except that portion contained in District 15; all of Cavalier County except that portion contained in District 19; and that part of Rolette County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the centerline of United States highway 281, also identified as thirtieth avenue northeast, and the north boundary of Rolette County, then east on the north boundary of Rolette County to the east boundary of Rolette County, then south on the east boundary of Rolette County until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-sixth street northeast, then west on ninety-sixth street northeast until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 1, also identified as forty-eighth avenue northeast, then north on BIA road 1 until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 4, also identified as one hundred second street northeast, then west on BIA road 4 until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 23, then south on BIA road 23 until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 8, also identified as jackrabbit road, then west on BIA road 8 until its intersection with the centerline of BIA road 25, also identified as thirty-first avenue northeast, then south on BIA road 25 until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-seventh street northeast, then west on ninety-seventh street northeast until its intersection with the Dunseith city limit, then south, west, and north on the Dunseith city limit until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-seventh street northeast, then east on ninety-seventh street northeast until its intersection with United States highway 281, also identified as thirtieth avenue northeast, then north on United States highway 281 to the point of beginning.

District 10 consists of that part of the city of Fargo in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of seventh avenue east intersects the centerline of seventeenth street east, also identified as fifty-second street southwest, then east on seventh street east until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth street south, then south on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue south, then east on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then south on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then west on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth street south, then north on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third avenue south, then west on thirty-third avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of veterans boulevard, also identified as ninth street east, then north on veterans boulevard until its intersection with the centerline of seter parkway south, then east on seter parkway south until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fifth street south, then north on fifty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then east on twenty-eighth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-first street south, then north on fifty-first street south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the west boundary of the West Fargo city limit, then north on the West Fargo city limit, also identified as seventeenth street east, to the point of beginning.

District 11 consists of that part of the city of Fargo in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of thirteenth avenue south intersects the centerline of interstate highway 29, then east on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then north on twenty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of ninth avenue south, then east on ninth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of tenth street south, then south on tenth street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue south, then east on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, also identified as the east boundary of Cass County, then south on the centerline of the Red River until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 81, also identified as south university drive, then south on United States highway 81 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue south, then west on twenty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth avenue south, then west on twenty-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then north on twenty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the point of beginning.

District 12 consists of Ashland, Bloom, Corinne, Courtenay, Durham, Fried, Gray, Nogosek, Rose, Spiritwood, and Winfield Townships in Stutsman County; and that part of the city of Jamestown and Woodbury Township in Stutsman County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of Jamestown Township intersects with the centerline of Pipestem Creek, then west, north, west, south, west, south, east, north, east, south, west, south, east, south, east, south, west, north, west, southeast, northwest, and south on the boundary of Jamestown Township until its intersection with the centerline of eighty-fifth avenue southeast, also identified as county road 39, then south on eighty-fifth avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-seventh street southeast, then west on thirty-seventh street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue southwest, then north on tenth avenue southwest until its intersection with the south boundary of Jamestown Township, then west on an extended south boundary and the south boundary of Jamestown Township until its intersection with the west boundary of Jamestown Township, then north, west, north, east, north, west, north, east, north, and east on the boundary of Jamestown Township until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, then east on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 52, then north on United States highway 52 until its intersection with the centerline of Pipestem Creek, also identified as the James River, then northwest on the Pipestem Creek until its intersection with the west boundary of the Jamestown city limit, then north on the Jamestown city limit until its intersection with the centerline of Pipestem Creek, then north on Pipestem Creek to the point of beginning.

District 13 consists of that part of the city of West Fargo and Barnes and Mapleton Townships in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of county road 10, also identified as twelfth avenue northwest, intersects the centerline of thirty-eighth street northwest, then east on county road 10 until its intersection with the centerline of the Sheyenne River, then south on the Sheyenne River until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as United States highway 10, then east on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth street east, then south on seventeenth street east until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth avenue east, then west on seventeenth avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of ninth street east, also identified as nineteenth avenue east, then south on ninth street east until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-eighth street northwest, then north on thirty-eighth street northwest to the point of beginning.

District 14 consists of all of Kidder County, Pierce County, Sheridan County, and Wells County; all of Benson County except Lallie, Lohnes, Minco, Mission, Oberon, Rock, Twin Tree, Warwick, West Bay, and Wood Lake Townships and Fort Totten and Lallie North Unorganized Townships; all of Eddy County except that part within the Spirit Lake reservation and that part of Freeborn Township bound by a line commencing at the point where the east boundary of the Spirit Lake reservation intersects the north boundary of Eddy County, then east and south on the boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the boundary of the Spirit Lake reservation, then north and west on the Spirit Lake reservation boundary to the point of beginning; and those portions of Burleigh County not contained in Districts 7, 8, 30, 32, 35, and 47.

District 15 consists of all of Ramsey County; Atkins, Bethel, Cando, Coolin, Maza, Olson, Springfield, and Zion Townships in Towner County; Lallie, Lohnes, Minco, Mission, Oberon, Rock, Twin Tree, Warwick, West Bay, and Wood Lake Townships and Fort Totten and Lallie North Unorganized Townships in Benson County; those portions of Eddy County within the Spirit Lake reservation; and that part of Freeborn Township in Eddy County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the Spirit Lake reservation boundary and the north boundary of Eddy County, also identified as thirtieth street northeast, then east on the north boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the east boundary of Eddy County, also identified as ninety-sixth avenue northeast, then south on the east boundary of Eddy County until its intersection with the Spirit Lake reservation boundary, then north on the Spirit Lake reservation boundary to the point of beginning.

District 16 consists of that part of the cities of Fargo and West Fargo and Barnes Township in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of interstate highway 94 intersects an extended centerline of fourteenth street west, then southeast on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of ninth street east, then north on ninth street east until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth avenue east, then east on seventeenth avenue east until its intersection with the east boundary of the West Fargo city limit, then south on the east boundary of the West Fargo city limit until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of fifty-first street south, then south on a straight line extending from fifty-first street south and on fifty-first street south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then west on twenty-eighth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fifth street south, then south on fifty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of seter parkway south, then west on seter parkway south until its intersection with the centerline of veterans boulevard, also identified as ninth street east, then south on veterans boulevard until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then west on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of ninth street west, then north on ninth street west until its intersection with the south boundary of the fortieth avenue west park, then northwest along the south boundary of the fortieth avenue west park and on an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of fifteenth street west, then north on fifteenth street west and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of fourteenth street west, then north on fourteenth street west and an extended straight line to the point of beginning.

District 17 consists of that part of the city of Grand Forks and Grand Forks and Walle Townships in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the centerline of thirty-second avenue south and the centerline of interstate highway 29, then east on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south columbia road, then south on south columbia road until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then east on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of United States business highway 81, then north on United States business highway 81 until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth avenue south, then east on seventeenth avenue south and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its intersection with the south boundary of Walle Township, then west on the south boundary of Walle Township until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the point of beginning.

District 18 consists of that part of the city of Grand Forks and Falconer, Ferry, and Turtle River Townships in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of eighteenth street northeast intersects with the north boundary of Grand Forks County, also identified as thirty-sixth avenue northeast, then east on the north boundary of Grand Forks County until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its intersection with an extended straight line from the centerline of seventeenth avenue south, then west on a straight line extended from seventeenth avenue south and on seventeenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of United States business highway 81, then south on United States business highway 81 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then west on twenty-eighth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south seventeenth street, then north on south seventeenth street until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue south, then east on twenty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south twentieth street, then north on south twentieth street until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then east on the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of north sixteenth street, then north on north sixteenth street until its intersection with the centerline of sixth avenue north, then west on sixth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of north twentieth street, then north on north twentieth street until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 2, also identified as gateway drive, then west on United States highway 2 until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north and west on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue northeast, then west on twenty-fourth avenue northeast until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth street northeast, then north on eighteenth street northeast to the point of beginning.

District 19 consists of all of Pembina County; all of Walsh County except that portion contained in District 20; and Alma, East Alma, Fremont, Hay, Hope, Loam, Montrose, North Olga, Osford, and South Olga Townships in Cavalier County.

District 20 consists of all of Traill County; all of Grand Forks County except for those portions contained in Districts 17, 18, 42, and 43; and Ardoch, Forest River, Ops, Prairie Centre, Walsh Centre, and Walshville Townships in Walsh County.

District 21 consists of that part of the cities of Fargo and West Fargo in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of United States highway 10, also identified as business interstate highway 94, intersects with the centerline of seventeenth street east, then east on United States highway 10 until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth avenue north, then east on twelfth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then south on the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of seventh avenue north, then east on seventh avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth street north, then south on twelfth street north until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then east on the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of tenth street north, also identified as United States highway 81, then south on tenth street north until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as United States highway 10, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue south, then west on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of tenth street south, then north on tenth street south until its intersection with the centerline of ninth avenue south, then west on ninth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then south on twenty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirteenth avenue south, then west on thirteenth avenue south until its intersection with forty-fifth street south, then north on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of seventh avenue east, then west on seventh avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of seventeenth street east, then north on seventeenth street east to the point of beginning.

District 22 consists of all of Cass County except those portions contained in Districts 10, 11, 13, 16, 21, 27, 41, 44, 45, and 46.

District 23 consists of Buford, Hardscrabble, and Trenton Townships in Williams County; and that part of the city of Williston and Judson, Missouri Ridge, Mont, Pherrin, Round Prairie, and Williston Townships in Williams County bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of a straight line extending west from fiftieth street northwest intersects the west boundary of Round Prairie Township, then west on the extended line and fiftieth street northwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred fifty-first avenue northwest, then south on one hundred fifty-first avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 2, then east on United States highway 2 until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 85, then north, west, and east on United States highway 85 until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred thirty-fourth avenue northwest, also identified as state business highway 85, then south on one hundred thirty-fourth avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-fourth street northwest, then west on fifty-fourth street northwest until its intersection with an extended straight line from the centerline of thirteenth avenue east, then south on a straight line extended from thirteenth avenue east and on thirteenth avenue until it becomes twenty-sixth street east, then west on twenty-sixth street east and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-second avenue west, then south on thirty-second avenue west until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred thirty-eighth avenue northwest, then south on one hundred thirty-eighth avenue northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then west, south, east, and north on the Missouri River until its intersection with the west boundary of Round Prairie Township, then north on the west boundary of Round Prairie Township to the point of beginning.

District 24 consists of all of Barnes County and Ransom County.

District 25 consists of all of Richland County and Marboe and Tewaukon Townships in Sargent County.

District 26 consists of all of McKenzie County except that portion contained in the Fort Berthold reservation; all of Halliday and Killdeer Townships in Dunn County; and that part of South Dunn Township in Dunn County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of South Dunn Township intersects the centerline of one hundred first avenue southwest, then east on the north boundary of South Dunn Township until its intersection with the east boundary of Dunn County, then south on the east boundary of Dunn County until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of eighteenth street southwest, then west on a straight line extending from eighteenth street southwest and on eighteenth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred first avenue southwest, then north on one hundred first avenue southwest to the point of beginning.

District 27 consists of that part of Pleasant and Stanley Townships in Cass County; and that part of the cities of Fargo and Horace in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of fifty-second avenue intersects the extended centerline of seventy-sixth street south, then east on fifty-second avenue until its intersection with the centerline of veterans boulevard south, then north on veterans boulevard south until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third avenue south, then east on thirty-third avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth street south, then south on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the north boundary of Stanley Township, then east on the north boundary of Stanley Township and the extended centerline of the north boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then south on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-fourth avenue south, then east on sixty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the east boundary of Stanley Township, then south on the east boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with an extended straight line from the centerline of seventy-third avenue south, then east on the straight line extended from seventy-third avenue south and on seventy-third avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-fifth avenue south, also identified as sixteenth street south, then south and east on seventy-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of eagle point drive south, then south on eagle point drive south until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-sixth avenue south, then east on seventy-sixth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south university drive, then south on south university drive until its intersection with the north boundary of Stanley Township, then east and north on the north boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of chrisan boulevard, then northeast on chrisan boulevard until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-first avenue south, then west on seventy-first avenue south until its intersection with the west boundary of Stanley Township, then north, west, north, and east on the boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its intersection with the south boundary of Pleasant Township, then west and north on the south boundary of Pleasant Township until its intersection with the south boundary of the Horace city limit, then west on the south boundary of the Horace city limit until its intersection with the west boundary of the Horace city limit, then north on the west boundary of the Horace city limit to the point of beginning.

District 28 consists of all of Dickey County, LaMoure County, Logan County, and McIntosh County; and all of Sargent County except that portion contained in District 25.

District 29 consists of all of Foster County, Griggs County, Nelson County, and Steele County; and all of Stutsman County except that portion contained in District 12.
